District of Columbia statutes.
39-302

Service of process.

The Museum shall maintain a designated agent to accept service of process for the Museum. Notice to or service upon the agent is notice or service upon the Museum.

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 3, 27 DCR 2546

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2102.

Prior Codifications